Utah statutes.
72-5-305.   Term of grant -- Abandonment.

(1)  In accordance with the terms of the R.S. 2477 right-of-way grant, once accepted, an R.S. 2477 right-of-way is established for a perpetual term.

(2) (a)  Abandonment of any R.S. 2477 right-of-way shall only take place in accordance with the procedures in Part 1, Public Highways, of this chapter.

(b)  If any R.S. 2477 right-of-way is abandoned by a political subdivision of the state, the right-of-way shall revert to the state.

(3)  The passage of time or the frequency of use of an R.S. 2477 right-of-way is not evidence of waiver or abandonment of the R.S. 2477 right-of-way.

(4)  An R.S. 2477 right-of-way continues even if the servient estate is transferred out of the public domain.

